Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 1. Guardians or Conservators

§ 3-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless otherwise required by the context or unless otherwise defined:

“Ancillary guardian” means a guardian appointed by a court of another state for a ward who is currently a resident of this state;

“Clerk” means clerk of the district court in the county in which the matter is pending and includes the clerk of the probate court;

“Conservator” means a person appointed by the court to have the custody and control of the property of a ward;

“Fiduciary” means a guardian or conservator;

“Guardian” means a person who has qualified as a guardian of a minor or incompetent person pursuant to an appointment by the court to exercise the powers granted by the court. The term includes a plenary, limited, emergency and standby guardian, but does not include a guardian ad litem;

“Guardian ad litem” means a person appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a respondent during the course of litigation;

“Guardian of the estate” means “conservator”;

“Guardian of the property” means “conservator”;

“Incompetent person” means an individual who, for reasons other than being a minor, is unable unassisted to properly manage and take care of himself or his property as a result of the medical conditions of advanced age, physical disability, disease, the use of alcohol or controlled substances, mental illness, mental deficiency or intellectual disability;

“Limited conservatorship” means a conservatorship in which the appointment by the court is limited in scope of duties or duration of appointment;

“Limited guardianship” means a guardianship in which the appointment by the court is limited in scope of duties or duration of appointment;

“Mentally incompetent person” means an individual who is unable unassisted to properly manage and take care of himself or his property as the result of mental illness, mental deficiency or intellectual disability;

“Plenary conservatorship” means a conservatorship in which the appointment by the court carries the full range of duties allowable by law;

“Plenary guardianship” means a guardianship in which the appointment by the court carries the full range of duties allowable by law;

“Ward” means an individual for whom a guardian or conservator has been appointed by the court or designated under W.S.

3-3-501

;

“Minor” means an unemancipated individual under the age of majority as defined by W.S. 14-1-101(a);

“Person” means an adult individual, or a nonprofit organization with a guardianship program;

“Respondent” means an adult or minor individual for whom a guardianship or conservatorship or other protective order is sought.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1993, ch. 156, § 2; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 2004, ch. 68, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (a)(v), which formerly read “‘Guardian’ means the person appointed by the court to have custody of the person of the ward”; in (a)(vi) substituted “respondent” for “proposed ward”; in (a)(ix) inserted “for reasons other than being a minor” following “means an individual who,” and “mental illness, mental deficiency or mental retardation” at the end; added (a)(xvi) through (xviii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “medical conditions” for “infirmities” in (a)(ix); and substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” at the end of (a)(ix) and (a)(xii).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

The definition of “mentally incompetent person” does not provide the standard for determining whether a person is mentally incompetent under §

27-14-505

so as to toll the statute of limitations for bringing a worker's compensation claim. Collicott v. State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Collicott), 2001 WY 35, 20 P.3d 1077,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2001).

Appointment proper. —

District court erred in vacating the grandmother's 2005 and 2006 guardianship appointment orders as void for lack of subject matter jurisdiction because, although the guardianship statutes did not authorize the appointment of a guardian for an unborn child, there was no question that the district court could have appointed a guardian for the child to take effect upon her birth; the district court had jurisdiction to act on the 2005 guardianship petition, but erred in its exercise of that jurisdiction; and the 2006 order extending guardianship was effectively a new appointment of the grandmother as the child's guardian as the district court made new findings of the need for the guardianship and outlined the guardian's obligations in detail. Clark v. Huffer (In re MKH), 2016 WY 103, 382 P.3d 1096,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied

in

McNeel v. McNeel, 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

§ 3-1-102.
Consent to jurisdiction.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, by accepting appointment, a guardian or conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship or conservatorship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian or conservator or mailed to him by certified mail at his address listed in the court records and to his address as then known to the petitioner.

In any matter concerning an adult, the provisions of chapter 8 of this title shall apply and shall supersede the terms of subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 2013 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section,” preceding “by accepting” in (a); and added (b).

Standing. —

Brother had standing to challenge the acceptance of a guardian report and conservator's annual accounting where he had a personal stake in prior proceedings involving his brother, and he had alleged that his sister was improperly discharging her duties as guardian and conservator. Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157, 364 P.3d 858,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 9, 2016).

§ 3-1-103.
Venue.

The venue for a guardianship proceeding is in the place where the minor, incompetent person or mental incompetent resides or is present. If a mentally incompetent person is admitted to an institution pursuant to order of a court of competent jurisdiction, venue is also in the county in which that court sits.

The venue for a conservatorship proceeding is in the county where the ward resides, whether or not a guardian has been appointed in another place. If the ward does not reside in this state then venue is in any county where the ward has property.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-1-104.
Proceedings against persons suspected of concealing ward's property.

Upon complaint of a person interested in the estate of the ward, the court may cite any person suspected of concealing, embezzling, converting or conveying property belonging to the ward to appear before the court and answer the complaint in the manner provided by the Wyoming Probate Code [§§

2-1-101

through

2-16-112

].

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-1-105.
Combining petition for guardian and conservator.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian and a conservator may be filed and the cause shall be tried as provided in W.S.

3-3-101

through

3-3-104

for the appointment of a conservator. The same person may be appointed to serve as both guardian and conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Third parties. —

Wife did not lack standing in a guardian/conservator action, because Wyoming's statutory scheme for requesting the voluntary appointment of a guardian and conservator allows for third parties to become involved, and the wife was sufficiently affected to guarantee an actual justiciable controversy where she was properly situated with sufficient pecuniary, personal, and tangible interests at stake given the pending divorce action. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 3-1-106.
Provisions applicable to all fiduciaries shall govern.

The provisions of W.S.

2-3-101

through

2-3-504

and

2-3-801

through

2-3-834

govern the appointment, qualification, substitution, removal, oath and bond of a guardian, limited guardian and conservator. A guardian or limited guardian shall not be required to give bond unless the court, for good cause, finds that the best interest of the ward requires a bond. The court shall then fix the terms and conditions of the guardian’s bond.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 34, § 1; 2013 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Substituted “2-3-504 and

2-3-801

through

2-3-834

” for “2-3-614”.

Cross references. —

As to bond of guardian of nonresident ward, see §

3-3-404

.

As to bond of guardian appointed under Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, see §

3-6-109

.

As to limitation of action on official bond or undertaking of a guardian, or upon a bond or undertaking given in pursuance of a statute, see §

1-3-108

.

For provision that sureties to the bond of a guardian may be made parties to a judgment thereon against the principal, see §

1-16-506

.

As to payment of premiums being includable as expense of trust with reference to bonds of fiduciaries, see §

38-2-107

.

Action against surety

on a guardian's bond is maintainable without prior accounting by guardian or an action against the guardian to fix his liability. United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Nash, 20 Wyo. 65, 121 P. 541,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 20 Wyo. 65, 121 P. 541,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1912).

Surety on guardian's bond held liable notwithstanding certain technical irregularities.

United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Parker, 20 Wyo. 29, 121 P. 531,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1912).

Extent of liability. —

Under a guardian's bond which runs to several wards jointly, the aggregate liability cannot exceed the amount of the penalty, with interest, from the time of demand, whether recovery is had jointly or severally. United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Parker, 20 Wyo. 29, 121 P. 531,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1912).

Under a bond given by a guardian running to three wards jointly, whose interests in the trust property are equal, the liability of the surety to each ward held limited to one-third of the amount of the penalty. United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Nash, 20 Wyo. 65, 121 P. 541,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 20 Wyo. 65, 121 P. 541,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1912).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court, in absence of statute, to require corporate surety on fiduciary bond in probate proceedings, 82 ALR2d 926.

§ 3-1-107.
Combination of involuntary, voluntary and standby petitions and hearings.

If prior to the time of hearing on a petition for the appointment of a guardian under W.S.

3-2-101

or for the appointment of a conservator under W.S.

3-3-101

, a petition is filed under the provisions of W.S.

3-2-105

,

3-2-106

,

3-2-302

,

3-3-106

,

3-3-107

or

3-3-301

, the court shall combine the hearings on the petitions and determine who shall be appointed guardian or conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 2005, ch. 193, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “3-2-302” after “3-2-106.”

Court may appoint a guardian/conservator when in best interest of ward. —

Pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 3-2-105(a) and 3-3-106(a), when an involuntary petition for the appointment of a guardian/conservator is not filed prior to a hearing on a voluntary petition, the court may appoint a guardian/conservator for the ward solely on a finding that such an appointment would be in the best interest of the ward. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

Third parties. —

Wife did not lack standing in a guardian/conservator action as Wyoming's statutory scheme for requesting the voluntary appointment of a guardian and conservator allows for third parties to become involved, and the wife was sufficiently affected to guarantee an actual justiciable controversy where she was properly situated with sufficient pecuniary, personal, and tangible interests at stake given a pending divorce action. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

Competency hearing. —

District court was not required to determine the competency of a husband pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

3-1-107

because an involuntary petition was not filed, or openly pending, prior to entry of the district court's order on the husband's voluntary petition seeking appointment of a guardian or conservator on his behalf. Additionally, the wife's last two motions requesting an independent medical examination and a competency hearing were well overdue. McNeel v. McNeel (In re McNeel), 2005 WY 36, 109 P.3d 510,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 3-1-108.
Guardians ad litem not affected.

The appointment of a guardian or conservator for a ward does not affect or impair the power of any court to appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of any minor, incompetent person or mentally incompetent person interested in any matter.

A guardian ad litem appointed in an action brought under this title shall report back to the court within thirty (30) days after appointment as to:

The condition of the proposed ward;

Recommendations for the court.

The guardian ad litem shall not have the powers of a guardian or conservator nor shall the guardian ad litem act as legal counsel for the proposed ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Cross references. —

For right of minor parent to bring suit in actions under Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see §

20-4-152

.

As to suits to be brought by and against guardian, and appointment of guardian ad litem, see Rule 17, W.R.C.P.

Stated

in

Nation v. Nation, 715 P.2d 198,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 504

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Attorney for Child Versus Guardian Ad Litem: Wyoming Creates a Hybrid, but is it a Formula for Malpractice?,” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 381 (1999).

§ 3-1-109.
Limitation of action on bond.

An action shall not be brought against the sureties on any bond given by a guardian or conservator unless it is commenced within five (5) years from the discharge or removal of the guardian or conservator, but if, at the time of the discharge, the person entitled to bring an action is under any legal disability to sue, the action may be commenced at any time within five (5) years after the disability is removed.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-1-110.
Order restricting disclosure.

Upon application, the court may order sealed any portion of a ward’s file containing those matters described in W.S. 16-4-203(b) and (d) and any personally identifiable information, including financial information relating to the ward. Sealed records are available for inspection only under court order.

Nothing in this section is intended to limit the guardian’s use of confidential information in the interests of the ward.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 1; 2011, ch. 59, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), added “and any personally identifiable information, including financial information relating to the ward.”

§ 3-1-111.
Complaint against guardian or conservator.

Any person having reason to believe that a guardian or conservator is not properly discharging his duties shall report the allegations and relevant supporting facts in a verified writing to the clerk of the district court that established the guardianship or conservatorship.

The clerk shall immediately send a copy of the complaint report to the guardian or conservator in the manner provided for service of process under Rule 4(r)(2) of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

The guardian or conservator shall have twenty (20) days in which to respond to the complaint report.

Upon receipt of the guardian’s or conservator’s response, or at the expiration of the twenty (20) day response time, whichever occurs earlier, the court shall either dismiss the complaint or set the matter for hearing. The court may dismiss the complaint if the complaint report and response show there is no basis for the allegations that the guardian or conservator is not properly discharging his duties.

Notice of the hearing shall be sent to the complainant, the guardian or conservator and, when ordered by the court, the ward.

At the conclusion of the hearing, or after determining there is no basis for the allegations and no need for a hearing, the court shall issue findings and enter an appropriate order.

The court may, within its discretion, assess court costs and impose attorneys fees against any party in an action instituted under this section.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 114, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “Rule 4(r)” for Rule 4(l)” following “under.”

No breach of fiduciary duty found. —

In a ward's
complaint against a guardian, the trial court did not err in finding
that the guardian did not breach his fiduciary duties; the guardian
substantially complied with the guardianship statutes. Under “filthy,
disgusting” conditions, the guardian proceeded to try to make the
ward's desire to stay in his home possible. Sands v. Brown (In re Sands), 2013 WY 60, 301 P.3d 128,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Apr. 13, 2012).

Standing. —

Brother had standing to challenge the acceptance of a guardian report and conservator's annual accounting where he had a personal stake in prior proceedings involving his brother, and he had alleged that his sister was improperly discharging her duties as guardian and conservator. Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157, 364 P.3d 858,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 9, 2016).